New York, session 2025-2026, A9388.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-y to read as follows: 3 § 391-y. Businesses offering physical manipulation services. 1. A 4 business offering physical manipulation services shall keep any street- 5 facing windows, entrances, and public-facing areas of the premises of 6 such business unobscured and shall ensure that there is clear visibility 7 from the public right-of-way into the lobby, reception, waiting area, or 8 other public-facing area of such premises. 9 2. a. For the purposes of this section, the term "physical manipu- 10 lation services" shall include massage therapy, reflexology, services 11 provided on feet at foot spas, bodywork, acupressure, or any other 12 service that involves physically manipulating any part of a human body, 13 whether or not such services require state licensure. 14 b. The term "physical manipulation services" shall not include 15 services provided: 16 (i) by any person who is authorized to practice medicine, nursing, 17 osteopathy, physiotherapy, chiropractic, or podiatry in accordance with 18 the provisions of title eight of the education law; 19 (ii) in barber shops or beauty parlors for the purpose of beautifica- 20 tion by any licensed barber or beauty culturist; 21 (iii) by any person employed in a medical institution licensed or 22 chartered by the state of New York, provided that such person is under 23 the on-site supervision of a person licensed to practice massage therapy 24 or authorized to practice massage therapy by subdivision one of section EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14241-01-5 A. 9388 2 1 seventy-eight hundred five of the education law, or by any person 2 enrolled in a program of a school or institute of massage therapy regis- 3 tered by the department of education, or enrolled in a program which 4 satisfies the requirements of section seventy-eight hundred four of the 5 education law, provided that such person is under the on-site super- 6 vision of a person licensed to practice massage therapy or authorized to 7 practice massage therapy by subdivision one of section seventy-eight 8 hundred five of the education law; 9 (iv) by any person duly employed as a trainer by a professional 10 athletic association, club or team, or as a member of the physical 11 education department of an accredited university, college or high 12 school; or 13 (v) by any person employed by a corporation or association organized 14 exclusively for the moral or mental improvement of people. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.